District of Columbia statutes.
28:10-103

Inconsistent laws; what law governs.

(a)

Except as provided by section 28:10-104, if any provision of law is inconsistent with this subtitle, this subtitle shall govern, unless this subtitle or the inconsistent provision of the other law specifically provides otherwise.

(b)

If any provision of this subtitle is inconsistent with the Commissioner’s Order entitled the Regulations Governing the Business of Buying, Selling and Financing of Motor Vehicles in the District of Columbia Department of Licenses and Inspections, issued October 20, 1960 (C.O. 60-2219; 5AA DCRR), the Commissioner’s Order shall govern, unless this subtitle or the inconsistent provision of the Commissioner’s Order specifically provides otherwise.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 769, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 31, 1982, D.C. Law 4-90, § 5, 29 DCR 666
1981 Ed., § 28:10-103.
1973 Ed., § 28:10-103.
This section provides for the repeal of all other legislation inconsistent with this Act.